Washington statutes.
RCW 3.58.060

County trial court improvement account—Contributions to account by county—Use of funds.

Any county with a district court created under this title shall create a county trial court improvement account. An amount equal to one hundred percent of the state's contribution received by the county for the payment of district court judges' salaries shall be deposited into the account. Money in the account shall be used to fund improvements to superior and district court staffing, programs, facilities, or services, as appropriated by the county legislative authority.

[ 2009 c 479 s 4; 2005 c 457 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2009 c 479: See note following RCW 2.56.030.

Intent—2005 c 457: See note following RCW 43.08.250.